Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-906
Secondary boycott; temporary injunction; grounds.

Any person injured or threatened with injury in his business, property or person by reason of any commission or threat of an unlawful act as provided in section 48-903 may, if the remedy provided by section 48-905 be inadequate, obtain injunctive relief, including temporary relief pending trial upon showing of an emergency, in the district courts of this state in accordance with the statutes, rules and practices applicable in other civil cases.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 6, p. 809.